District of Columbia statutes.
16-4008

Approval of agreement by tribunal.

The tribunal may approve an agreement resulting from a collaborative law process.

History

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4006.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 8 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.